Nebraska, session 109, LB759A.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB759A LB759A
2026 2026
Section 1. There is hereby appropriated (1) $415,000 from the
Department of Water, Energy, and Environment Cash Fund for FY2025-26 and
(2) $415,000 from the Department of Water, Energy, and Environment Cash
Fund for FY2026-27 to the Department of Water, Energy, and Environment,
for Program 334, to aid in carrying out the provisions of Legislative
Bill 759, One Hundred Ninth Legislature, Second Session, 2026.
Sec. 2. There is hereby appropriated (1) $150,000 from the
Livestock Waste Management Cash Fund and $75,000 from the Integrated
Solid Waste Management Cash Fund for FY2025-26 and (2) $150,000 from the
Livestock Waste Management Cash Fund and $325,000 from the Integrated
Solid Waste Management Cash Fund for FY2026-27 to the Department of
Water, Energy, and Environment, for Program 513, to aid in carrying out
the provisions of Legislative Bill 759, One Hundred Ninth Legislature,
Second Session, 2026.
No expenditures for permanent and temporary salaries and per diems
for state employees shall be made from funds appropriated in this
section.
-2-